Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-633
Construction and application.

The Uniform Electronic Transactions Act must be construed and applied:

(1) To facilitate electronic transactions consistent with other applicable law;

(2) To be consistent with reasonable practices concerning electronic transactions and with the continued expansion of those practices; and

(3) To effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of the act among states enacting it.

Laws 2000, LB 929, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 86-2106;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 395.